California, session 20252026, SB655.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Heat is the leading weather-related cause of death in the United States, with heat waves increasing in frequency, duration, and intensity.(b) The State Department of Public Health in 2023 reported 395 excess deaths in California during a 10-day heat wave in September 2022.(c) The California Fourth Climate Change Assessment estimates that by 2050 urban heat-related deaths could double or triple due to rising temperatures.(d) California residential building standards, based on international and uniform model codes, have long specified that residential dwelling units must be able to maintain a minimum indoor air temperature of 68 degrees Fahrenheit, or 20 degrees Celsius, yet there is no requirement with respect to a maximum indoor air temperature for residential dwelling units.(e) Vulnerable and disadvantaged communities are disproportionately affected by extreme heat more than other communities.SEC. 2. Section 17914 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:17914. (a) It is hereby declared to be the established policy of the state that all dwelling units, as defined in Section 1940 of the Civil Code, shall be able to attain and maintain a safe maximum indoor temperature.(b) All relevant state agencies, including but not limited to, the California Environmental Protection Agency, Department of Housing and Community Development, Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation, Public Utilities Commission, State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, State Air Resources Board, State Department of Health Care Services, State Department of Public Health, and Strategic Growth Council shall consider the state policy identified in subdivision (a) for both of the following:(1) When revising, adopting, or establishing policies, programs, and criteria, including grant criteria, that are relevant to achieving this state policy.(2) Beginning January 1, 2027, when revising, adopting, or establishing regulations that are relevant to achieving this state policy.(c) This section does not expand any obligation of the state to provide a safe maximum indoor temperature or to require the expenditure of additional resources to develop infrastructure beyond the obligations that may exist pursuant to subdivision (b).